Alabama, session 2026rs, HB664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Family Farm Resilience and Revenue Stabilization Act.
Section 2. For purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) ECONOMIC SHOCK. Any of the following:
a. A decline of 20 percent or more in the statewide
average price of a primary agricultural commodity within a
90-day period;
b. Documented trade retaliation or export restriction
affecting a primary state commodity;
c. A documented increase of 25 percent or more in core
agricultural input costs within a six-month period; or
d. A state of emergency declared by the Governor by
proclamation that materially affects agricultural production.
(2) FAMILY FARM. An agricultural operation that:
a. Is primarily owned by one or more state residents;
b. Is actively managed by the owner or his or her
immediate family; and
c. Has an annual gross income of not more than one
Page 2

c. Has an annual gross income of not more than one
HB664 INTRODUCED
million dollars ($1,000,000) for the preceding calendar year.
Section 3. (a) The Family Farm Resilience Fund is
established in the State Treasury from which the Commissioner
of Agriculture and Industries shall administer this act. The
fund shall consist of any monies appropriated by the
Legislature and any voluntary contributions, gifts, and
grants.
(b) Monies deposited into the fund shall be disbursed
only upon warrants of the Comptroller drawn upon the State
Treasury on itemized vouchers approved by the commissioner. No
monies shall be withdrawn or expended except as budgeted and
allocated according to Article 4 of Chapter 4 and Chapter 19
of Title 41, Code of Alabama 1975, and only in amounts as
stipulated in the general appropriations act, other
appropriations acts, or this section. At the end of each
fiscal year, any unencumbered balance in the fund shall not
revert to the State General Fund under Section 41-4-93, Code
of Alabama 1975.
Section 4. (a) The Commissioner of Agriculture and
Industries shall establish the Family Farm Resilience and
Revenue Stabilization Program within the Department of
Agriculture and Industries to distribute both of the following
to eligible family farms during economic shock:
(1) Bridge grants that shall not exceed 15 percent of
the annual gross income of a farm for the preceding calendar
year.
(2) Revenue gap payments that shall be calculated
against a three-year rolling revenue average of a farm.
Page 3

against a three-year rolling revenue average of a farm.
HB664 INTRODUCED
(b) Total assistance distributed to a farm pursuant to
this act shall not exceed one hundred forty thousand dollars
($140,000) annually.
Section 5. The Commissioner of Agriculture and
Industries, not later than the first legislative day of each
regular session of the Legislature, shall submit to the
Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Senate
Minority Leader, the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
and the House Minority Leader a report detailing all funds
distributed pursuant to this act and any proposed legislative
action.
Section 6. The Department of Agriculture and Industries
shall adopt rules to administer this act, including criteria
for eligible family farms.
Section 7. This act shall become effective on October
100 1, 2026.
Page 4